vi: Mức độ tẩy tế bào chết: Sâu; Hai mặt; Cực chắc; Cực nhẹ nhàng; Chắc; Nhẹ; Vừa; Khác
es: Nivel de exfoliación: Profunda; Doble cara; Extrafirme; Extra suave; Firme; Amable; Medio; Otros
bg-BG: Ниво на ексфолиация: Дълбока; Двустранна; Изключително висока; Екстра нежна; Висока; Слаб; Средна; Други
hu: Hámlasztási szint: Mély; Kétoldalas; Extra kemény; Extra gyengéd; Kemény; Enyhe; Közepes; Egyéb
en: Exfoliation level: Deep; Dual-sided; Extra firm; Extra gentle; Firm; Gentle; Medium; Other
zh-TW: 去角質程度: 深層; 雙面型; 額外結實; 特別溫和; 結實; 溫和; 中等; 其他
lt-LT: Šveitimo lygis: Gilus; Dvipusis; Itin tvirtas; Ypač švelnus; Tvirtas; Lengvi; Vidutinis; Kita
ja: 角質除去レベル: ディープ; 両面型; 超硬め; エクストラジェントル; 硬め; 弱い; 中挽き; その他
th: ระดับการขัดผิว: ลึก; สองด้าน; แน่นมาก; อ่อนโยนพิเศษ; แน่น; อ่อนโยน; ปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
da: Eksfolieringsniveau: Dyb; Dobbeltsidet; Ekstra fast; Ekstra mild; Fast; Blid; Medium; Andet
cs: Úroveň exfoliace: Hluboká; Oboustranný; Extra pevné; Extra jemná; Pevná; Slabé; Střední; Jiné
sl-SI: Stopnja luščenja: Globoko; Dvostranska; Zelo čvrsta; Ekstra nežno; Čvrsta; Nežna; Medij; Drugo
pl: Poziom złuszczania: Głęboki; Dwustronna; Bardzo sztywny; Ekstra delikatny; Stałe; Delikatny; Średni; Inne
pt-BR: Nível de esfoliação: Profunda; Dupla face; Extra firme; Extra suave; Firme; Suave; Médio; Outro
hr-HR: Razina eksfolijacije: Duboko; Dvostrani; Ekstra čvrsto; Ekstra nježno; Čvrsto; Slabo; Polusuho; Ostalo
zh-CN: 去角质强度: 深度; 双面; 特硬; 特温和; 结实; 温和; 中度; 其他
el: Επίπεδο απολέπισης: Βαθιά; Διπλής όψης; Ιδιαίτερα έντονη; Έξτρα απαλή; Έντονη; Ήπια; Μέση; Άλλο
fi: Kuorintataso: Syvä; Kaksipuolinen; Erittäin kiinteä; Erittäin hellävarainen; Kiinteä; Kevyt; Keskimääräinen; Muu
nb: Eksfolieringsnivå: Dyp; Dobbeltsidig; Ekstra fast; Ekstra mild; Fast; Mild; Middels; Annet
ru: Уровень отшелушивания: Глубокий; Двусторонняя; Очень твердый; Экстра мягкий; Твердый; Легкий; Средний; Другой
it: Livello di esfoliazione: Profonda; Doppia faccia; Extra compatto; Extra delicata; Compatto; Debole; Medio; Altro
nl: Exfoliatieniveau: Diep; Dubbelzijdig; Extra hard; Extra mild; Stevig; Mild; Medium; Andere
ko: 각질 제거 수준: 딥; 듀얼 사이드; 매우 단단함; 초순함; 단단함; 약함; 중간; 기타
tr: Peeling seviyesi: Derin; Çift taraflı; Ekstra sert; Ekstra nazik; Katı; Narin; Orta; Diğer
fr: Niveau d’exfoliation: Profond; Double face; Extra ferme; Extra doux; Ferme; Doux; Moyen; Autre
sv: Exfolieringsnivå: Djup; Dubbelsidig; Extra fast; Extra mild; Fast; Mild; Medium; Övrigt
de: Peeling-Niveau: Tief; Doppelseitig; Extra fest; Extra sanft; Kräftig; Sanft; Mittel; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Nível de esfoliação: Profunda; Dupla face; Extra firme; Extra suave; Firme; Macio; Moagem média; Outro
sk-SK: Úroveň exfoliácie: Hlboká; Obojstranná; Extra pevný; Extra jemná; Pevný; Jemný; Stredný; Iné
ro-RO: Nivelul de exfoliere: Profundă; Cu două fețe; Extra ferm; Extra delicată; Ferm; Redusă; Medie; Altele